Utah statutes.
48-2e-809.   Liability of general partner and person dissociated as general partner when claim against limited partnership barred.

If a claim against a dissolved limited partnership is barred under Section 48-2e-806, 48-2e-807, or 48-2e-808, any corresponding claim under Section 48-2e-404 or 48-2e-607 is also barred.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

